Washington statutes.
RCW 36.82.090

Anticipation warrants against road fund.

The board may expend funds from the county road fund or register warrants against the county road fund in anticipation of funds to be paid to the county from the motor vehicle fund.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.82.090. Prior: 1943 c 82 s 6; 1937 c 187 s 54; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6450-54.]